Hawaii statutes.
§806-30 Alternative allegations. In an
indictment for an offense which is constituted of one or more of several acts
or which may be committed by one or more of several means or with one or more
of several intents, or which may produce one or more of several results, two or
more of those acts, means, intents, or results may be charged in the
alternative. [L 1915, c 215, pt of §2; RL 1925, §4043; RL 1935, §5502; RL 1945,
§10804; RL 1955, §258-14; HRS §711-30; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1]

Case Notes

In robbery, the terms "from the person" and "from
the custody and in the presence" are synonymous and may be alleged in
alternative in an indictment. 26 H. 725 (1923).

Indictment alleging four alternative non-synonymous subjects
for inquiry is defective for uncertainty. 37 H. 552 (1947).

Indictment alleging several acts in the alternative not
duplicitous. 39 H. 574 (1952).

Cited: 27 H. 65 (1923), 102; 36 H. 550, 552 (1943), aff'd
150 F.2d 545 (1945).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next